Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1728.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1901-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding clauses to read:Section 1901-A. Definitions.--The following words and phrases, as used in this article, shall, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, have the following meaning:* * *(16) "First responder" shall mean any of the following public servants:12345678910111213141516171819 (i) An emergency medical services provider or EMS provider, as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 8103 (relating to definitions), who is an active volunteer, employe or member of an emergency medical service company that is:(A) designated by a municipality as the municipality's primary emergency medical service provider; or(B) dispatched by a public safety answering point as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 5302 (relating to definitions) or in accordance with a mutual aid agreement under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7504 (relating to coordination, assistance and mutual aid).(ii) An active volunteer, employe or member of a fire company as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802 (relating to definitions) who responds to emergency calls.(iii) A Pennsylvania State Police officer.(iv) A peace officer as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 501 (relating to definitions) who responds to emergency calls.(17) "First responder training program" shall mean a for-credit, two-year or less-than-two-year occupational or technical program to prepare students to enter first responder occupations.(18) "Noncredit first responder training courses" shall mean noncredit courses provided off-campus, on-campus or through any form of distance education for the specific purpose of providing opportunities for students and incumbent workers to develop or upgrade skills necessary in first responder occupations.Section 2. Section 1913-A(k.1)(2)(iii) of the act is amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding clauses to read:Section 1913-A. Financial Program; Reimbursement of Payments.* * *20250HB1728PN2128 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) * * *(1.9) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the payment for a community college shall consist of the following:(i) An amount equal to the allocation the community college received from the amount appropriated for community colleges in the immediately preceding fiscal year.(ii) An enrollment-based allocation to be calculated as follows:(A) Subtract the amount allocated in subclause (i) from the amount appropriated for community colleges.(B) Multiply the audited full-time equivalent enrollment as verified under subsection (k.1) for the most recent year available for the community college by the difference in paragraph (A). (C) Divide the product in paragraph (B) by the sum of the audited full-time equivalent enrollment as verified under subsection (k.1) for the most recent year available for all community colleges.(1.10) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, each community college shall receive a first responder training allocation to be calculated as follows:(i) Determine a weighted first responder training enrollment for each community college by calculating the sum of the following based upon the most recent year available:(A) The audited full-time equivalent students enrolled in a first responder training program at the community college multiplied by 1.50.(B) The audited full-time equivalent students enrolled in noncredit first responder training courses at the community 20250HB1728PN2128 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 college.(ii) Multiply the weighted first responder training enrollment in subclause (i) for each community college by the amount appropriated for community colleges for first responder training.(iii) Divide the product in subclause (ii) by the sum of the weighted first responder training enrollment in subclause (i) for all community colleges.* * *(k.1) * * *(2) The audited financial statement required under clause (1) shall include:* * *(iii) a verification of equivalent full-time students enrolled in the community college in each of the following categories: credit, noncredit, first responder training programs and courses and each economic development stipend category, during the fiscal year for which the audited financial statement is presented.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB1728PN2128 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122